Utah statutes.
78A-6-604.   Minor held in detention -- Credit for good behavior.

(1)  The judge may order whether a minor held in detention under Subsection 78A-6-117(2)(f) or 78A-6-1101(3) is eligible to receive credit for good behavior against the period of detention.  The rate of credit is one day for every three days served.  The Division of Juvenile Justice Services shall, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establish rules describing good behavior for which credit may be earned.

(2)  Any disposition including detention under Subsection 78A-6-117(2)(f) or 78A-6-1101(3) shall be concurrent with any other order of detention.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

